Oklahoma, session 2025, SB248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2251, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2251. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a revolving fund for the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department
to be designated the “Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall be under the administrative
direction of the Department.
B. The fund shall consist of all monies received:
1. Monies received by the Department pursuant to the provisions
of this act, monies the Oklahoma Tourism, Parks and Recreation
Enhancement Act;
2. Monies derived from the sale, transfer, lease, or other
conveyance of real property under the jurisdiction of the Oklahoma
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB248 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Tour ism and Recreation Commission, except those leases entered into
pursuant to a concessionaire agreement; and interest
3. Interest attributable to investment of money in the fund.
The revolving fund shall be a continuing fund not subject to fiscal
year limitations and shall be under the administrative direction of
the Department. Expenditures
C. All monies accruing to the fund from the sale, transfer,
lease, or other conveyance of the real property under paragraph 2 of
subsection B of this section shall be appropriated for maintenance
and capital projects of the state parks; provided, that these funds
shall not be expended for any compensation of any employee of any
state agency. All other expenditures from the fund created by this
section shall be for the administration, operation, and maintenance
expenses of the Department, and for purchase of real property, and
shall be made pursuant to the laws of this state and the statutes
relating to the Department. Expenditures from said the fund shall
be made pursuant to the laws of this state and statutes relating to
the Department and shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
February 26, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB248 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)